Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.390

Acquisition of stock of banks organized under laws of foreign country, etc.

Any bank may acquire and hold, directly or indirectly, stock or other evidence of indebtedness or ownership in one or more banks organized under the law of a foreign country or a dependency or insular possession of the United States.

[ 2014 c 37 s 132; 1986 c 279 s 14; 1973 1st ex.s. c 104 s 10. Formerly RCW 30.04.390.]